Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.310

Division of elections—Duties.

The secretary of state, through the division of elections, is responsible for the following duties, as prescribed by Title 29A RCW:

(1) The filing, verification of signatures, and certification of state initiative, referendum, and recall petitions;

(2) The production and distribution of a state voters' pamphlet;

(3) The examination, testing, and certification of voting equipment, voting devices, and vote tallying systems;

(4) The administration, canvassing, and certification of the presidential primary, state primaries, and state general elections;

(5) The administration of motor voter and other voter registration and voter outreach programs;

(6) The training, testing, and certification of state and local elections personnel as established in RCW 29A.04.530;

(7) The conduct of reviews as established in RCW 29A.04.570; and

(8) Other duties that may be prescribed by the legislature.

[ 2009 c 415 s 11; 2003 c 111 s 2303; 1992 c 163 s 2.]